Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1775YH (5) 91 jm/jh H.F. 203 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15E.365 Caitlin Clark and Lisa 1 Bluder monument tax credit. 2 1. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, 3 but before January 1, 2030, a tax credit shall be allowed 4 against the taxes imposed in chapter 422, subchapters II, III, 5 and V, and in chapter 432, and against the moneys and credits 6 tax imposed in section 533.329, equal to twenty-five percent 7 of a personâs donation to the Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder 8 monument tax credit fund in section 15E.366. An individual 9 may claim a tax credit under this section of a partnership, 10 limited liability company, S corporation, estate, or trust 11 electing to have income taxed directly to the individual. The 12 amount claimed by the individual shall be based upon the pro 13 rata share of the individualâs earnings from the partnership, 14 limited liability company, S corporation, estate, or trust. 15 2. The amount of the donation for which the tax credit is 16 claimed shall not be deductible in determining taxable income 17 for state income tax purposes. 18 3. Any tax credit in excess of the personâs tax liability 19 for the tax year may be credited to the tax liability for the 20 following five years or until depleted, whichever occurs first. 21 A tax credit shall not be carried back to a tax year prior to 22 the tax year in which the person claims the tax credit. 23 4. a. The aggregate amount of tax credits authorized 24 pursuant to this section shall not exceed a total of one 25 million dollars. 26 b. The maximum amount of tax credits granted to a person 27 shall not exceed five percent of the aggregate amount of tax 28 credits authorized. 29 c. Ten percent of the aggregate amount of tax credits 30 authorized shall be reserved for those donations in amounts 31 of thirty thousand dollars or less. If any portion of the 32 reserved tax credits have not been distributed by September 1, 33 2028, the remaining reserved tax credits shall be available to 34 any other eligible person. 35 -1- LSB 1775YH (5) 91 jm/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 203 5. The tax credit shall not be transferable to any other 1 person. 2 6. The authority shall develop a system for authorization 3 of tax credits under this section and shall control the 4 distribution of all tax credits to persons providing a 5 donation subject to this section. The authority shall 6 adopt administrative rules pursuant to chapter 17A for the 7 qualification and administration of the donations made pursuant 8 to this section. 9 7. This section is repealed December 31, 2035. 10 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 15E.366 Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder 11 monument tax credit fund. 12 1. A Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder monument tax credit 13 fund is created in the state treasury under the control of the 14 authority. The fund shall consist of appropriations made to 15 the fund, donations, and transfers of interest, earnings, and 16 moneys from other funds or sources as provided by law. The 17 Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder monument fund shall be separate 18 from the general fund of the state and the balance in the fund 19 shall not be considered part of the balance of the general fund 20 of the state. 21 2. a. Moneys in the fund shall be used by the authority to 22 fund the construction of a monument of Caitlin Clark and Lisa 23 Bluder to celebrate the accomplishments of Caitlin Clark and 24 Lisa Bluder on and off the basketball court. The authority 25 shall coordinate the solicitation of donations to the fund 26 with the governorâs office, the university of Iowa, and the 27 offices of the majority leader of the senate and the speaker 28 of the house to determine the location and type of monument to 29 be constructed. 30 b. The authority shall not solicit donations in excess of 31 the estimated costs to construct the monument. 32 3. Moneys in the Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder monument 33 fund are not subject to section 8.33. Notwithstanding section 34 12C.7, subsection 2, interest or earnings on moneys in the fund 35 -2- LSB 1775YH (5) 91 jm/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 203 shall be credited to the fund. 1 4. This section is repealed December 31, 2035, and any 2 remaining moneys in the fund shall be transferred to the 3 general fund of the state. 4 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 422.11X Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder 5 monument tax credit. 6 The tax imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 7 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a Caitlin 8 Clark and Lisa Bluder monument tax credit authorized pursuant 9 to section 15E.365. 10 Sec. 4. Section 422.33, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 11 following new subsection: 12 NEW SUBSECTION . 33. The taxes imposed under this subchapter 13 shall be reduced by a Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder monument 14 tax credit allowed under section 15E.365. 15 Sec. 5. Section 422.60, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 16. The taxes imposed under this subchapter 18 shall be reduced by a Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder monument 19 tax credit allowed under section 15E.365. 20 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 432.12P Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder 21 monument tax credit. 22 The taxes imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by a 23 Caitlin Clark and Lisa Bluder monument tax credit allowed under 24 section 15E.365. 25 Sec. 7. Section 533.329, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 26 by adding the following new paragraph: 27 NEW PARAGRAPH . n. The moneys and credits tax imposed under 28 this section shall be reduced by a Caitlin Clark and Lisa 29 Bluder monument tax credit allowed under section 15E.365. 30